Hawaii statutes.
[§551E‑14] Agent's resignation;
notice. Unless the power of attorney provides a different method for an
agent's resignation, an agent may resign by giving notice to the principal and,
if the principal is incapacitated:

(1) To the conservator or guardian, if one has been
appointed for the principal, and a co-agent or successor agent; or

(2) If there is no person described in paragraph (1),
to:

(A) The principal's caregiver;

(B) Another person reasonably believed by the
agent to have sufficient interest in the principal's welfare; or

(C) A governmental agency having authority to
protect the welfare of the principal. [L 2014, c 22, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next